Nebraska, session 109, LB132.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB132 LB132
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 60-6,273, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
60-6,273 Evidence that a person was not wearing an occupant
protection system or a three-point safety belt system at the time he or
she was injured is shall not be admissible in any civil proceeding for
purposes of determining: regard to the issue of liability
(1) Liability or proximate cause; and
(2) Mitigation but may be admissible as evidence concerning
mitigation of damages , except that it shall not reduce recovery for
damages by more than five percent.
Sec. 2. Original section 60-6,273, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-